Missouri, session 2026, SB1101.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 44.010, 44.032, and 44.100, RSMo, are
repealed and three new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 44.010, 44.032, and 44.100, to read as
follows:
44.010. As used in sections 44.010 to 44.130, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Agency", the state emergency management agency;
(2) "Bioterrorism", the intentional use of any
microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or biological
product that may be engineered as a result of biotechnology,
or any naturally occurring or bioengineered component of any
such microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or
biological product, to cause death, disease, or other
biological malfunction in a human, an animal, a plant, or
another living organism in order to influence the conduct of
government or to intimidate or coerce a civilian population;
(3) "Director", the director of the state emergency
management agency;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1101 2
(4) "Disasters", disasters which may result from
terrorism, including bioterrorism, or from fire, wind,
flood, earthquake, or other natural or man-made causes;
(5) "Disaster area", a geographic area or areas within
the state which have been designated as such by the governor
or by resolution of the general assembly, due to the
occurrence of a disaster, for the purpose of providing
economic or other relief as provided in section 44.032;
(6) "Economic or geographic area", an area or areas
within the state, or partly in this state and adjacent
states, comprising political subdivisions grouped together
for purposes of administration, organization, control or
disaster recovery and rehabilitation in time of emergency;
[(6)] (7) "Emergency", any state of emergency declared
by proclamation by the governor, or by resolution of the
legislature pursuant to sections 44.010 to 44.130 upon the
actual occurrence of a natural or man-made disaster of major
proportions within this state when the safety and welfare of
the inhabitants of this state are jeopardized;
[(7)] (8) "Emergency management", government at all
levels performing emergency functions, other than functions
for which military forces are primarily responsible;
[(8)] (9) "Emergency management functions", "emergency
management activities" and "emergency management service",
those functions required to prepare for and carry out
actions to prevent, minimize and repair injury and damage
due to disasters, to include emergency management of
resources and administration of such economic controls as
may be needed to provide for the welfare of the people,
either on order of or at the request of the federal
government, or in the event the federal government is
incapable of administering such control;

SB 1101 3
[(9)] (10) "Emergency resources planning and
management", planning for, management and coordination of
national, state and local resources;
[(10)] (11) "Executive officer of any political
subdivision", the county commission or county supervisor or
the mayor or other manager of the executive affairs of any
city, town, village or fire protection district;
[(11)] (12) "Local organization for emergency
management", any organization established under this law by
any county or by any city, town, or village to perform local
emergency management functions;
[(12)] (13) "Management", the activities of the
emergency management director in the implementation of
emergency operations plans during time of emergency;
[(13)] (14) "Planning", activities of the state and
local emergency management agency in the formulation of
emergency management plans to be used in time of emergency;
[(14)] (15) "Political subdivision", any county or
city, town or village, or any fire district created by law;
[(15)] (16) "Urban search and rescue task force", any
entity whose primary responsibility is to locate, remove,
and provide medical care to persons in collapsed buildings.
44.032. 1. (1) As used in this section, the term
"rural electric cooperative" means any rural electric
cooperative organized or operating under the provisions of
chapter 394, any corporation organized on a nonprofit or a
cooperative basis as described in subsection 1 of section
394.200, or any electrical corporation operating under a
cooperative business plan as described in subsection 2 of
section 393.110.
(2) The general assembly recognizes the necessity for
anticipating and making advance provisions to care for the

SB 1101 4
unusual and extraordinary burdens imposed by disasters or
emergencies on this state, its political subdivisions, and
rural electric cooperatives. To meet such situations, it is
the intention of the general assembly to confer emergency
powers on the governor, acting through the director, and
vesting the governor with adequate power and authority
within the limitation of available funds in the Missouri
disaster fund to meet any such emergency or disaster.
2. There is hereby established a fund to be known as
the "Missouri Disaster Fund", to which the general assembly
may appropriate funds and from which funds may be
appropriated annually to the state emergency management
agency. The funds appropriated shall be expended during a
state emergency at the direction of the governor and upon
the issuance of an emergency declaration which shall set
forth the emergency, or the designation of a disaster area
as defined in section 44.010, and shall state that it
requires the expenditure of public funds to furnish
immediate aid and relief. The director of the state
emergency management agency shall administer the fund.
3. Expenditures may be made upon direction of the
governor for emergency management, as defined in section
44.010, or to implement the state disaster plans.
Expenditures may also be made to meet the matching
requirements of state and federal agencies for any
applicable assistance programs.
4. Assistance may be provided from the Missouri
disaster fund to political subdivisions of this state and
rural electric cooperatives that have suffered from a
disaster to such an extent as to impose a severe financial
burden exceeding the ordinary reserve capacity of the
subdivision or rural electric cooperative affected.

SB 1101 5
Applications for aid under this section shall be made to the
state emergency management agency on such forms as may be
prescribed and furnished by the agency, which forms shall
require the furnishing of sufficient information to
determine eligibility for aid and the extent of the
financial burden incurred. The agency may call upon other
agencies of the state in evaluating such applications. The
director of the state emergency management agency shall
review each application for aid under the provisions of this
section and recommend its approval or disapproval, in whole
or in part, to the governor. If approved, the governor
shall determine and certify to the director of the state
emergency management agency the amount of aid to be
furnished. The director of the state emergency management
agency shall thereupon issue the director's voucher to the
commissioner of administration, who shall issue the
commissioner's warrants therefor to the applicant.
5. When a disaster or emergency has been proclaimed by
the governor or there is a national emergency, the director
of the state emergency management agency, upon order of the
governor, shall have authority to expend funds for the
following:
(1) The purposes of sections 44.010 to 44.130 and the
responsibilities of the governor and the state emergency
management agency as outlined in sections 44.010 to 44.130;
(2) Employing, for the duration of the response and
recovery to emergency, additional personnel and contracting
or otherwise procuring necessary appliances, supplies,
equipment, and transport;
(3) Performing services for and furnishing materials
and supplies to state government agencies, counties,
municipalities, and rural electric cooperatives with respect

SB 1101 6
to performance of any duties enjoined by law upon such
agencies, counties, municipalities, and rural electric
cooperatives which they are unable to perform because of
extreme natural or man-made phenomena, and receiving
reimbursement in whole or in part from such agencies,
counties, municipalities, and rural electric cooperatives
able to pay therefor under such terms and conditions as may
be agreed upon by the director of the state emergency
management agency and any such agency, county, municipality,
or rural electric cooperative;
(4) Performing services for and furnishing materials
to any individual in connection with alleviating hardship
and distress growing out of extreme natural or man-made
phenomena, and receiving reimbursement in whole or in part
from such individual under such terms as may be agreed upon
by the director of the state emergency management agency and
such individual;
(5) Providing services to counties and municipalities
with respect to quelling riots and civil disturbances;
(6) Repairing and restoring public infrastructure;
(7) Furnishing transportation for supplies to
alleviate suffering and distress;
(8) Furnishing medical services and supplies to
prevent the spread of disease and epidemics;
(9) Quelling riots and civil disturbances;
100 (10) Training individuals or governmental agencies for
101 the purpose of perfecting the performance of emergency
102 assistance duties as defined in the state disaster plans;
103 (11) Procurement, storage, and transport of special
104 emergency supplies or equipment determined by the director
105 to be necessary to provide rapid response by state

SB 1101 7
106 government to assist counties and municipalities in
107 impending or actual emergencies;
108 (12) Clearing or removing from publicly or privately
109 owned land or water, debris and wreckage which may threaten
110 public health or safety;
111 (13) Reimbursement to any urban search and rescue task
112 force for any reasonable and necessary expenditures incurred
113 in the course of responding to any declared emergency under
114 this section; and
115 (14) Such other measures as are customarily necessary
116 to furnish adequate relief in cases of catastrophe or
117 disaster.
118 6. The governor may receive such voluntary
119 contributions as may be made from any source to aid in
120 carrying out the purposes of this section and shall credit
121 the same to the Missouri disaster fund.
122 7. All obligations and expenses incurred by the
123 governor in the exercise of the powers and duties vested by
124 the provisions of this section shall be paid by the state
125 treasurer out of available funds in the Missouri disaster
126 fund, and the commissioner of administration shall draw
127 warrants upon the state treasurer for the payment of such
128 sum, or so much thereof as may be required, upon receipt of
129 proper vouchers provided by the director of the state
130 emergency management agency.
131 8. The provisions of this section shall be liberally
132 construed in order to accomplish the purposes of sections
133 44.010 to 44.130 and to permit the governor to cope
134 adequately with any emergency which may arise, and the
135 powers vested in the governor by this section shall be
136 construed as being in addition to all other powers presently

SB 1101 8
137 vested in the governor and not in derogation of any existing
138 powers.
139 9. Such funds as may be made available by the
140 government of the United States for the purpose of
141 alleviating distress from disasters may be accepted by the
142 state treasurer and shall be credited to the Missouri
143 disaster fund, unless otherwise specifically provided in the
144 act of Congress making such funds available.
145 10. The foregoing provisions of this section
146 notwithstanding, any expenditure or proposed series of
147 expenditures which total in excess of one thousand dollars
148 per project shall be approved by the governor prior to the
149 expenditure.
44.100. 1. The emergency powers of the governor shall
be as follows:
(1) The provisions of this section shall be operative
only during the existence of a state of emergency (referred
to in this section as "emergency"). Any emergency shall be
limited to the least restrictive geographic area and the
provisions of this section shall be enforced in the least
intrusive, disruptive, or restrictive manner to the economic
and social activities of the citizens of this state. The
existence of an emergency may be proclaimed by the governor
or by resolution of the legislature, if the governor in his
proclamation, or the legislature in its resolution, finds
that a natural or man-made disaster of major proportions has
actually occurred within this state, and that the safety and
welfare of the inhabitants of this state require an
invocation of the provisions of this section;
(2) Any emergency proclaimed by the governor may be
called for no more than ten days unless extended by a
concurrent resolution of the general assembly. Any

SB 1101 9
emergency proclaimed by resolution of the general assembly,
or any extension of an emergency, shall be called for no
more than thirty days and such resolution shall be by a two-
thirds majority of the members of both the house of
representatives and the senate. Any emergency, whether
proclaimed by the governor or by the legislature, shall
terminate upon the proclamation thereof by the governor, or
the passage by the legislature, of a resolution terminating
such emergency;
(3) During the period that the state of emergency
exists or continues, the governor shall:
(a) Enforce and put into operation all plans, rules
and regulations relating to disasters and emergency
management of resources adopted under this law and to assume
direct operational control of all emergency forces and
volunteers in the state;
(b) Take action and give directions to state and local
law enforcement officers and agencies as may be reasonable
and necessary for the purpose of securing compliance with
the provisions of this law and with the orders, rules and
regulations made pursuant thereof;
(c) Seize, take or requisition to the extent necessary
to bring about the most effective protection of the public:
a. Any means of transportation, other than railroads
and railroad equipment and fuel, and all fuel necessary for
the propulsion thereof;
b. Any communication system or part thereof necessary
to the prompt and efficient functioning of the emergency
management of the state;
c. All stocks of fuel;
d. Facilities for housing, feeding and hospitalization
of persons, including buildings and plants;

SB 1101 10
(d) Control, restrict and regulate by rationing,
freezing, use of quotas, prohibitions on shipments, price
fixing, allocation or other means the use, sale or
distribution of food, feed, fuel, clothing and other
commodities, materials, goods or services;
(e) Prescribe and direct activities in connection with
but not limited to use, conservation, salvage and prevention
of waste of materials, services and facilities, including
production, transportation, power and communication
facilities, training and supply of labor, utilization of
industrial plants, health and medical care, nutrition,
housing, including the use of existing and private
facilities, rehabilitation, education, welfare, child care,
recreation, consumer protection and other essential civil
needs;
(f) Use or distribute all or any of this property
among the inhabitants of the state in any area adversely
affected by a natural or man-made disaster and to account to
the state treasurer for any funds received thereof;
(g) Waive or suspend the operation of any statutory
requirement or administrative rule regarding the licensing,
certification or issuance of permits evidencing
professional, mechanical or other skills;
(h) Waive or suspend the operation of any statutory
requirement or administrative rule prescribing procedures
for conducting state business, where strict compliance with
such requirements and rules would prevent, hinder, or delay
necessary action by the department of health and senior
services to respond to a declared emergency or increased
health threat to the population;
(i) In accordance with rules or regulations, provide
that all law enforcement authorities and other emergency

SB 1101 11
response workers and agencies of other states who may be
within this state at the request of the governor or pursuant
to state or local mutual-aid agreements or compacts shall
have the same authority and possess the same powers, duties,
rights, privileges and immunities as are possessed by like
law enforcement authorities and emergency response workers
and agencies of this state;
(j) Perform and exercise such other functions, powers
and duties as may be necessary to promote and secure the
safety and protection of the civilian population;
(k) Authorize the director of finance and the director
of credit unions to waive or suspend the operation of any
statutory requirement or administrative rule applicable to
the division of finance, banking, financial services, or the
division of credit unions and take action and give direction
to banks, credit unions, and financial institutions,
100 including coordinating actions with emergency responders,
101 federal agencies, and state banking and credit union
102 associations as may be reasonable and necessary to preserve
103 the safety and soundness of banks, credit unions, and
104 financial institutions; and facilitate disaster response and
105 recovery efforts to serve essential civil needs and protect
106 the public interest.
107 2. When any property is seized, taken or requisitioned
108 under this section, the circuit court of the county in which
109 the property was taken may on the application of the owner
110 thereof or on the application of the governor in cases where
111 numerous claims may be filed, appoint three disinterested
112 commissioners in the manner provided by section 523.040 to
113 assess the damages which the owners may have sustained by
114 reason of the appropriation thereof. Upon the application
115 the amount due because of the seizure of property shall be

SB 1101 12
116 determined in the manner provided in chapter 523 for the
117 determination of damages in case of the exercise of the
118 power of eminent domain.
✓